Maine, session 132, LD648.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §3036-A, sub-§10-A is enacted to read:
10-A. Prisoner served at least 15 years and crime committed prior to 26 years of
age. With the consent of the prisoner, the commissioner may transfer a prisoner committed
to the department from a correctional facility to supervised community confinement
without meeting the eligibility requirements of subsection 2, paragraphs B, C and D if:
A. The prisoner is serving a term of imprisonment of at least 15 years;
B. The prisoner has served at least 15 years of the term of imprisonment imposed;
C. The crime or crimes for which the prisoner is serving the term of imprisonment
were committed before the prisoner attained 26 years of age; and
D. The prisoner has continuously maintained a custody classification level of medium,
medium trustee status or minimum for the 5 years preceding the prisoner's
consideration for the supervised community confinement program.